Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-510
State Archaeology Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Archaeology Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund may be used to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Archaeological Resources Preservation Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 10.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.